test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tsiil_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tsīļ: # Noun 132 'eng /est siil -i/fin' - full paradigm
     tsīļ+N+Sg+Nom: tsīļ
     tsīļ+N+Sg+Gen: tsīļ
     tsīļ+N+Sg+Par: tsīļõ
     tsīļ+N+Sg+Dat: tsīļõn
     tsīļ+N+Sg+Ins: tsīļõks
     tsīļ+N+Sg+Ill: tsīļõ
     tsīļ+N+Sg+Ela: tsīļštõ
     tsīļ+N+Pl+Nom: tsīļõd
     tsīļ+N+Pl+Gen: tsīļõd
     tsīļ+N+Pl+Par: tsīļidi
     tsīļ+N+Pl+Dat: tsīļõdõn
     tsīļ+N+Pl+Ins: tsīļõdõks
     tsīļ+N+Pl+Ill: tsīļiž
     tsīļ+N+Pl+Ela: tsīļist
